Maryland, session 2026, SB0742.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
7–309.
(b) (1) An individual receiving Administration services who receives notice
from the Department that the individual has lost eligibility to receive Maryland Medical
Assistance Program services [shall have 90 days after the date on which the notification
letter was mailed to] MAY appeal the determination.
(2) If an individual appeals a loss of eligibility within the time period
required under [paragraph (1) of this subsection] § 42 C.F.R. 431.231, Administration
services for the individual shall continue uninterrupted until the outcome of the appeal is
complete.
(3) The Department shall ensure that providers of Administration services
to an individual affected by a loss of eligibility are notified of the individual’s loss of
eligibility when notice is sent to the individual.
(4) The Department shall ensure that providers, including coordinators of
community services, have the ability to automatically exchange electronic data with the
Department through an application program interface with the Department’s Long Term
Services and Supports software system.
15–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(h) “Program” means the Maryland Medical Assistance Program.
(i) “Program recipient” means an individual who receives benefits under the
Program.

SENATE BILL 742
15–103.9.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “EX PARTE REDETERMINATION” MEANS A PROCESS BY WHICH
THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES A PROGRAM RECIPIENT’S ELIGIBILITY TO
CONTINUE TO RECEIVE SERVICES USING EXISTING DATA, WITHOUT REQUIRING THE
PROGRAM RECIPIENT TO SUBMIT ADDITIONAL INFORMATION.
(3) “HOME– AND COMMUNITY–BASED SERVICES” MEANS SERVICES
AUTHORIZED UNDER A MEDICAID STATE PLAN OPTION OR WAIVER UNDER § 1115
OR § 1915(C), (I), OR (K) OF THE FEDERAL SOCIAL SECURITY ACT.
(4) “PROCEDURAL DISENROLLMENT” MEANS THE TERMINATION OF A
PROGRAM RECIPIENT’S ELIGIBILITY TO RECEIVE SERVICES BASED ON REASONS
RELATED TO THE RENEWAL PROCESS AND NOT ON A DETERMINATION OF
INELIGIBILITY.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF 42
C.F.R. § 435.912 RELATED TO THE TIMELY DETERMINATION AND
REDETERMINATION OF PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY, INCLUDING PROCESSING AN
APPLICATION:
(1) IF A DETERMINATION OF DISABILITY IS NOT REQUIRED, WITHIN
45 DAYS AFTER THE RECEIPT OF THE APPLICATION; AND
(2) IF A DETERMINATION OF DISABILITY IS REQUIRED, WITHIN 90
DAYS AFTER THE RECEIPT OF THE APPLICATION.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONDUCT EX PARTE REDETERMINATIONS
AND USE ALL PROCEDURES AUTHORIZED UNDER 42 C.F.R. § 435.916 TO PREVENT
PROCEDURAL DISENROLLMENT OF INDIVIDUALS RECEIVING HOME– AND
COMMUNITY–BASED SERVICES.
(D) IN ACCORDANCE WITH 42 C.F.R. § 435.905 AND SUBJECT TO
SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE, IN
ELECTRONIC AND PAPER FORMATS, AND ORALLY AS APPROPRIATE AN
ACCOMMODATION, THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION TO ALL APPLICANTS AND OTHER
INDIVIDUALS ON REQUEST:
(1) REQUIREMENTS FOR PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY;

SENATE BILL 742 5
(2) AVAILABLE PROGRAM SERVICES; AND
(3) THE RIGHTS AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF APPLICANTS AND
PROGRAM RECIPIENTS.
(E) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE THE INFORMATION
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION IN PLAIN LANGUAGE AND IN A
MANNER THAT IS TIMELY AND ACCESSIBLE TO INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE:
(I) LIMITED ENGLISH PROFICIENT THROUGH THE PROVISION
OF LANGUAGE SERVICES, INCLUDING ORAL INTERPRETATION AND WRITTEN
TRANSLATIONS, AT NO COST TO THE INDIVIDUAL; OR
(II) LIVING WITH DISABILITIES THROUGH THE PROVISION OF
AUXILIARY AIDS AND SERVICES AT NO COST TO THE INDIVIDUAL IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE FEDERAL AMERICANS WITH DISABILITIES ACT AND § 504 OF THE
FEDERAL REHABILITATION ACT OF 1973.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE TAGLINES IN NON–ENGLISH
LANGUAGES TO INFORM INDIVIDUALS OF:
(I) THE AVAILABILITY OF THE ACCESSIBLE INFORMATION AND
LANGUAGE SERVICES UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
(II) HOW TO ACCESS THE INFORMATION AND SERVICES.
(F) IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT THE INFORMATION
NECESSARY TO CONFIRM A PROGRAM RECIPIENT’S ELIGIBILITY TO CONTINUE TO
RECEIVE SERVICES IS INCOMPLETE, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONTINUE TO
PROVIDE THE HOME– AND COMMUNITY–BASED SERVICES AND OTHER SERVICES
UNDER THE PROGRAM UNTIL THE PROGRAM RECIPIENT HAS EXHAUSTED ALL DUE
PROCESS RIGHTS AND A FINAL DETERMINATION IS ISSUED.
(G) (1) IF A PROGRAM RECIPIENT IS PROCEDURALLY DISENROLLED
FROM HOME– AND COMMUNITY–BASED SERVICES DUE TO A FAILURE BY THE
DEPARTMENT TO REDETERMINE ELIGIBILITY IN A TIMELY MANNER AFTER THE
RECIPIENT HAS TIMELY RETURNED INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER 42 C.F.R. §
435.916(B)(2)(1)(B) AND 42 C.F.R. § 435.952(C) AND THE DELAY IN THE
REDETERMINATION WAS NO FAULT OF THE PROGRAM RECIPIENT, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL REINSTATE THE PROGRAM RECIPIENT’S ELIGIBILITY AND THE
PROVISION OF HOME– AND COMMUNITY–BASED SERVICES AND AUTHORIZE

SENATE BILL 742
ENROLLMENT RETROACTIVELY TO THE DATE OF DISENROLLMENT PENDING THE
DEPARTMENT’S COMPLETION OF THE REDETERMINATION PROCESS.
(2) THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT THE
DEPARTMENT’S AUTHORITY OR DIMINISH THE DEPARTMENT’S RESPONSIBILITY TO
REINSTATE THE ELIGIBILITY OF AND THE PROVISION OF HOME– AND
COMMUNITY–BASED SERVICES TO A PROGRAM RECIPIENT WHO HAS BEEN
DISENROLLED FOR A REASON OTHER THAN A FAILURE BY THE DEPARTMENT TO
REDETERMINE ELIGIBILITY IN A TIMELY MANNER.
(H) (G) SUBJECT TO FEDERAL APPROVAL, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
RESERVE A PORTION OF THE PARTICIPANT CAPACITY IN THE HOME– AND
COMMUNITY–BASED SERVICES WAIVER UNDER § 1915(C) OF THE FEDERAL SOCIAL
SECURITY ACT WAIVERS FOR SERVICES NEEDED BY PROGRAM RECIPIENTS WITH
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES WHO:
(1) WERE DISENROLLED FROM THE MARYLAND MEDICAID HOME
AND COMMUNITY–BASED SERVICES WAIVER PROGRAM ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1,
2024;
(2) HAVE HAD PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY REINSTATED; AND
(3) HAVE REQUESTED THE REINSTATEMENT OF WAIVER SERVICES.
(I) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT PLACE AN INDIVIDUAL ON A WAITING LIST
OR REQUIRE A NEW WAIVER APPLICATION IF THE DISENROLLMENT OF THE
INDIVIDUAL RESULTED FROM A DELAY OR AN ERROR BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(J) (H) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT PROCEDURALLY DISENROLL
AN INDIVIDUAL FROM THE PROGRAM OR HOME– AND COMMUNITY–BASED SERVICES
SOLELY BASED ON MISSING DOCUMENTATION, A MISSING SIGNATURE, OR
INCOMPLETE INFORMATION UNLESS THE DEPARTMENT HAS:
(I) EXHAUSTED ALL EX PARTE VERIFICATION PROCESSES
REQUIRED UNDER 42 C.F.R. § 435.916;
(II) PROVIDED A CLEAR, SPECIFIC, AND ACCESSIBLE WRITTEN
NOTICE IDENTIFYING THE EXACT INFORMATION REQUIRED; AND
(III) PROVIDED THE PROGRAM RECIPIENT WITH A REASONABLE
OPPORTUNITY TO SUPPLY THE INFORMATION; AND

SENATE BILL 742 7
(IV) VERIFIED THAT THE INDIVIDUAL RECEIVED THE NOTICE
REQUIRED UNDER ITEM (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH AND DOCUMENTED THE
VERIFICATION.
(2) IF THE DEPARTMENT VIOLATES PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A PROGRAM RECIPIENT’S HOME– AND COMMUNITY–BASED SERVICES
SHALL CONTINUE WITHOUT INTERRUPTION.
(K) (I) IF THE DEPARTMENT DISENROLLS A PROGRAM RECIPIENT IN
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) AUTOMATICALLY REINSTATE PROGRAM AND HOME– AND
COMMUNITY–BASED SERVICES RETROACTIVE TO THE DATE OF DISENROLLMENT;
AND
(2) TREAT THE PROGRAM RECIPIENT AS CONTINUOUSLY ENROLLED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–103.9.
(L) (J) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, AND QUARTERLY
THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) SUBMIT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, A REPORT REGARDING
PROGRAM RECIPIENTS WHO RECEIVE HOME– AND COMMUNITY–BASED SERVICES;
AND
(II) POST EACH REPORT SUBMITTED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH ON THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE.
(2) THE REPORTS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF PROGRAM RECIPIENTS FOR WHOM
A REDETERMINATION OF ELIGIBILITY WAS INITIATED;
(II) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF PROGRAM RECIPIENTS FOR WHOM
PROGRAM COVERAGE IS RENEWED;

SENATE BILL 742
(III) OF THE PROGRAM RECIPIENTS WHOSE ELIGIBILITY IS
RENEWED, THE TOTAL NUMBER WHOSE COVERAGE WAS RENEWED BASED ON AN EX
PARTE REDETERMINATION;
(IV) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF PROGRAM RECIPIENTS WHOSE
ELIGIBILITY WAS REINSTATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS
SECTION;
(IV) (V) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF PROGRAM RECIPIENTS
WHOSE ELIGIBILITY WAS TERMINATED;
(V) (VI) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF PROGRAM RECIPIENTS
WHOSE ELIGIBILITY WAS TERMINATED FOR PROCEDURAL REASONS;
(VII) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF PROGRAM RECIPIENTS WHOSE
ELIGIBILITY WAS TERMINATED DUE TO A FAILURE BY THE DEPARTMENT TO
REDETERMINE ELIGIBILITY IN A TIMELY MANNER; AND
(VI) (VIII) THE MEAN AND MEDIAN PROCESSING TIMES FOR
REDETERMINATIONS OF ELIGIBILITY.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026. Section 2 of this Act shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at
the end of September 30, 2029, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.